Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8009
Applicability of act.

The Health Care Prompt Payment Act does not apply to any individual or group policies that provide coverage for a specific disease, accident-only coverage, hospital indemnity coverage, disability income coverage, medicare supplement coverage, long-term care coverage, or other limited-benefit coverage. The act does not apply to any claim submitted before January 1, 2006.

Laws 2005, LB 389, § 9.